Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.610

Graduate fellowship trust fund—Matching funds.

Funds appropriated by the legislature for the graduate fellowship program shall be deposited in the graduate fellowship trust fund. At the request of the office under RCW 28B.76.620, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the designated institution's local endowment fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the fund. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the graduate fellowship trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 117; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 916; 2009 c 564 s 1806; 2004 c 275 s 22; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 88; 1987 c 147 s 3. Formerly RCW 28B.10.882.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.